Massachusetts, session 194th, H4018.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 231 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 91B the
following section:-
Section 91C. (a) A person shall not, in an action for slander or libel, be held liable in
damages for any communication made, without malice, regarding an incident in which they were
the victim of sexual assault, harassment or discrimination.
(b) A prevailing defendant in any slander or libel action brought against that defendant
for making a communication to which subsection (a) applies shall be entitled to reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs, plus treble damages for any harm caused to them by the defamation
action against them, in addition to any other relief permitted by law.
(c) This section shall only apply to an individual who has, or at any time had, a
reasonable basis to file a complaint of sexual assault, harassment or discrimination, whether or
not the complaint was actually filed.
of 1